lexc-files/prs-num/concessive.txt
!============================
LEXICON IntrConc
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive concessive 
!============================

!-----------------------|--------------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|
^[3Sg]:^an      Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:agh^ma    Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:agh^pek   Enclitic; ^[4Sg]:agh^mi   Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^ita     Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:agh^mta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:agh^pesi  Enclitic; ^[4Pl]:agh^meng Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^ayek    Enclitic; ^[1Du]:agh^mtung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:agh^petek Enclitic; ^[4Du]:agh^mek  Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^agkenka Enclitic;
!-----------------------|--------------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|


!===========================
LEXICON TrnsConc
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive concessive 
!===========================

!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^agu           Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^aki           Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^akek           Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^itgu          Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^itki          Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^itkek          Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^agnegu        Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^agneki        Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^agnekek        Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:agh^mkun       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:agh^mki        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:agh^mkek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:agh^mteggu     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:agh^mteki      Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:agh^mtekek      Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:agh^mtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:agh^mtegneki   Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:agh^mtegnekek   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:agh^pegu       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:agh^peki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:agh^pekek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:agh^pesigu     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:agh^pesiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:agh^pesikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:agh^petegnegu  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:agh^petegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:agh^petegnekek  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:agh^migu       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:agh^miki       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:agh^mikek       Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:agh^megteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:agh^megteki    Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:agh^megtekek    Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:agh^megnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:agh^megneki    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:agh^megnekek    Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga          Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^inkut         Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^inkung         Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga         Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^inkut         Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^inkung         Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga       Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^inkut         Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^inkung         Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                                       |
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:agh^penga      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:agh^pekut      Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:agh^pekung      Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:agh^pesinga    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:agh^pesikut    Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:agh^pesikung    Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:agh^petegnenga Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:agh^petegnekut Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:agh^petegnekung Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:agh^minga      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:agh^mikut      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:agh^mikung      Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:agh^megtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:agh^megtekut   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:agh^megtekung   Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:agh^megnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:agh^megneku    Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:agh^megnekung   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten          Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^isi           Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten          Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^isi           Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten          Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^isi           Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:agh^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:agh^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:agh^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:agh^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:agh^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:agh^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:agh^mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:agh^msi        Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:agh^mtek        Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                                                       |
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:agh^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:agh^misi       Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:agh^mitek       Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:agh^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:agh^misi       Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:agh^mitek       Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:agh^miten      Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:agh^misi       Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:agh^mitek       Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.4Sg]:^atni          Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Pl]:^isteng        Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
^[3Pl.4Sg]:^atni          Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Pl]:^isteng        Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
^[3Du.4Sg]:^atni          Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Pl]:^isteng        Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Du]:^istek          Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.4Sg]:agh^mni        Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Pl]:agh^mteng      Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Du]:agh^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Pl.4Sg]:agh^mnni       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Pl]:agh^mteng      Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Du]:agh^mtek        Enclitic;
^[1Du.4Sg]:agh^mtegnegu   Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Pl]:agh^mtegnek    Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Du]:agh^mtegnekek   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.4Sg]:agh^pegu       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Pl]:agh^peki       Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Du]:agh^pekek       Enclitic;
^[2Pl.4Sg]:agh^pesigu     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Pl]:agh^pesiki     Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Du]:agh^pesikek     Enclitic;
^[2Du.4Sg]:agh^petegnegu  Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Pl]:agh^petegneki  Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Du]:agh^petegnekek  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
! no [4--.4--] forms                                                                                       |
!---------------------------------|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|
